Florida, session 2026, SB86.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 41 42 Section 1.âPresent subsection (3) of section 316.3026, 43 Florida Statutes, is redesignated as subsection (4), a new 44 subsection (3) and subsection (5) are added to that section, and 45 subsection (1) of that section is amended, to read: 46 316.3026âUnlawful operation of motor carriers.â 47 (1)âThe Office of Commercial Vehicle Enforcement may issue 48 out-of-service orders to motor carriers, as defined in s. 49 320.01, who, after proper notice, have failed to pay any penalty 50 or fine assessed by the department, or its agent, against any 51 owner or motor carrier for violations of state law, refused to 52 submit to a compliance review and provide records pursuant to s. 53 316.302(6) or s. 316.70, or violated safety regulations pursuant 54 to s. 316.302 or insurance requirements in s. 627.7415. Such 55 out-of-service orders have the effect of prohibiting the 56 operations of any motor vehicles owned, leased, or otherwise 57 operated by the motor carrier upon the roadways of this state, 58 until the violations have been corrected or penalties have been 59 paid. Out-of-service orders must be approved by the director of 60 the Division of the Florida Highway Patrol or his or her 61 designee. An administrative hearing pursuant to s. 120.569 shall 62 be afforded to motor carriers subject to such orders. 63 (3)(a)âIt is the policy of the state to address the 64 emerging issue of commercial motor vehicle operation by 65 unauthorized aliens who are not authorized to operate in this 66 state pursuant to s. 322.033 and who may not meet English 67 language proficiency requirements or have the operational 68 understanding to safely operate such vehicles. This threat to 69 the life and safety of the motoring public is deemed an imminent 70 safety hazard. Commercial motor vehicle operators in this state 71 must be lawfully present in the United States; have a valid 72 driver license; understand the English language; be able to read 73 and follow roadway signage, rules, regulations, laws, and 74 directions; and be able to communicate effectively with law 75 enforcement officers. 76 (b)âA sworn law enforcement officer who has the authority 77 to take an unauthorized alien as defined in s. 908.111(1) into 78 custody pursuant to an agreement established under s. 287(g) of 79 the Immigration and Nationality Act, 8 U.S.C. s. 1357, and who 80 determines that an unauthorized alien is operating a commercial 81 motor vehicle shall take such unauthorized alien into custody 82 and facilitate his or her transfer into the custody of a federal 83 immigration agency as defined in s. 908.102, consistent with 84 federal and state law. The commercial motor vehicle operated by 85 the unauthorized alien must be impounded and removed to a secure 86 wrecker operatorâs storage facility or a law enforcement impound 87 lot. The sworn law enforcement officer shall immediately notify 88 the Florida Highway Patrol that such unauthorized alien has been 89 taken into custody and provide information necessary for the 90 issuance of an out-of-service order to the motor carrier, 91 including, but not limited to, the offense or incident report; 92 any video and audio recordings of the incident; any photographs 93 of the unauthorized alien and the commercial motor vehicle; the 94 name of the motor carrier; the United States Department of 95 Transportation number displayed on the commercial motor vehicle; 96 the commercial motor vehicleâs registration number, license 97 plate number, and vehicle identification number; and any 98 insurance policy information. 99 (c)âIf an unauthorized alien is taken into custody and a 100 commercial motor vehicle is impounded under paragraph (b), the 101 motor carrier is liable for a civil penalty of $50,000. This 102 penalty is in addition to any other applicable penalty. A 103 commercial motor vehicle impounded under paragraph (b) may not 104 be released to the motor carrier or the ownerâs agent unless the 105 civil penalty is paid or a bond is posted in accordance with s. 106 316.545(5) and any costs associated with the impoundment, 107 including costs for towing and storing the commercial motor 108 vehicle and providing legal notice of the impoundment, are paid. 109 The Office of Commercial Vehicle Enforcement shall issue an out 110 of-service order to the motor carrier. 111 (d)âIf, during a department investigation, safety audit, or 112 normal business activity, it is discovered that a motor carrier 113 has allowed, within the last 12 months, or is allowing an 114 unauthorized alien to operate a commercial motor vehicle in 115 violation of this subsection, the Office of Commercial Vehicle 116 Enforcement may issue an out-of-service order to and impose a 117 civil penalty of $50,000 upon the motor carrier. 118 (e)âA motor carrier operating in this state is subject to 119 penalties under paragraph (d) if the department finds that the 120 motor carrier was issued an out-of-service order by any other 121 state or the Federal Motor Carrier Safety Administration for 122 allowing an unauthorized alien to operate a commercial motor 123 vehicle within the last 12 months or has an unresolved out-of 124 service order related to allowing an unauthorized alien to 125 operate a commercial motor vehicle. 126 (f)âAn out-of-service order issued under this subsection 127 must be approved by the director of the Division of the Florida 128 Highway Patrol or his or her designee. Further, an out-of 129 service order issued under this subsection may be removed only 130 after the department has approved a corrective action plan 131 agreed to by the motor carrier and the motor carrier has paid 132 any civil penalties, or as provided by a decision rendered in a 133 proceeding held under subsection (5). 134 (g)âAll penalties imposed and collected pursuant to this 135 subsection shall be paid to the Chief Financial Officer, who 136 shall credit the funds to the Highway Safety Operating Trust 137 Fund within the department to fund training and technology 138 necessary to enforce this subsection. 139 (5)âAn administrative hearing pursuant to s. 120.569 must 140 be afforded to a motor carrier subject to an out-of-service 141 order pursuant to this section. 142 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.